Massachusetts, session 194th, HD6281.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Subsection (e) of section 1 of chapter 162 of the acts of 2020, as amended by section 1 of
chapter 73 of the acts of 2024, is hereby further amended by striking out the words “All licenses
granted under this act shall be issued not later than August 20, 2026” and inserting in place
thereof the following words:- All licenses granted under this act shall be issued by August 20,
2029.
of 1